Alabama, session 2026rs, SB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may cited as the
Page 1

Section 1. This act shall be known and may cited as the
SB223 INTRODUCED
Limitation on Use of ADS-B Data Act.
Section 2. (a) The Legislature finds that Automatic
Dependent Surveillance–Broadcast (ADS-B) systems are designed
to enhance aviation safety, situational awareness, and
efficiency by allowing aircraft to broadcast positional and
status information to air traffic control and other
appropriately equipped receivers.
(b) The Legislature further finds that the use of ADS-B
data to identify specific aircraft for the purpose of
assessing fees or otherwise imposing charges on the owners or
operators of the aircraft raises privacy, fairness, and policy
concerns unrelated to the safety purposes for which the system
was developed.
(c) It is the purpose of this act to prohibit the use
of ADS-B data to identify aircraft for the assessment of fees
or the imposition of charges on owners or operators, while
preserving the ability of aviation stakeholders to use ADS-B
for safety, regulatory compliance, and operational purposes.
Section 3. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings.
(1) ADS-B DATA. Any information contained in or derived
from ADS-B broadcasts, including aircraft position, velocity,
heading, identification codes or call signs, and other flight
status information, which is collected, recorded, processed,
or stored by public or private parties.
(2) AUTOMATIC DEPENDENT SURVEILLANCE-BROADCAST (ADS-B).
A surveillance technology in which an aircraft determines its
position from onboard navigation sources and automatically
Page 2

position from onboard navigation sources and automatically
SB223 INTRODUCED
broadcasts that position and other ADS-B data via radio data
link. The term includes both ADS-B Out transmissions from
aircraft and ADS-B In reception of the broadcasts.
(3) FEE or CHARGE. Any monetary assessment, toll, tax,
surcharge, or other required payment imposed on an aircraft
owner or operator, including, without limitation, usage-based
fees, distance-based fees, or access charges.
(4) GOVERNMENT AGENCY. Any department, agency, board,
commission, authority, or other instrumentality of the state;
any county or municipality within the state; or any political
subdivision or public corporation thereof.
(5) PERSON. Any individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, association, organization, trust,
estate, governmental entity, or other legal entity of any
kind.
Section 4. (a) No person, including a government
agency, shall use ADS-B data to identify an aircraft for the
purpose of assessing a fee or otherwise imposing a charge on
the owner or operator of the aircraft.
(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) applies when the
ADS-B data is obtained:
(1) Directly from broadcast reception;
(2) Indirectly through third parties; or
(3) From databases or services that compile or
disseminate ADS-B information.
Section 5. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
restrict:
(1) The use of ADS-B data by air traffic control; the
Page 3

(1) The use of ADS-B data by air traffic control; the
SB223 INTRODUCED
Federal Aviation Administration; or aviation service providers
for safety of flight, traffic management, search and rescue,
accident investigation, facility planning, or regulatory
compliance purposes; or
(2) The voluntary, contractual use of ADS-B data by
aircraft owners or operators with service providers for
operational services, including flight following, maintenance,
or safety analytics, provided the data is not used to identify
the aircraft for the assessment of fees or charges on the
owner or operator.
Section 6. (a) Any person aggrieved by a violation of
Section 4 may bring a civil action in a court of competent
jurisdiction for:
(1) Injunctive relief to prevent or restrain further
violation;
100 (2) Actual damages, or statutory damages of up to five
101 thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, whichever is greater;
102 and
103 (3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.
104 (b) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce
105 this act and seek:
106 (1) Civil penalties not to exceed ten thousand dollars
107 ($10,000) per violation;
108 (2) Injunctive relief; and
109 (3) Any other relief the court deems appropriate.
110 Section 7. This act shall not be construed to conflict
111 with or impede any federal law, regulation, or function
112 related to aviation safety, air traffic management, or the
Page 4

related to aviation safety, air traffic management, or the
SB223 INTRODUCED
113 operation and maintenance of the national airspace system.
114 Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
115 1, 2026.
Page 5